District of Columbia statutes.
42-3638

Court costs and attorney’s fees.

Expired.

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 8a
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-176, § 2(f), 43 DCR 4234
1981 Ed., § 45-2559.7a.
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(f) of the Drug House Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-446, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6664).